fi: Media > Podcastit ja suorat lähetykset: Suorat lähetykset; Podcastit; Radio-ohjelmat
cs: Média > Podcasty a živé streamy: Živé streamy; Podcasty; Rozhlasová vysílání
pl: Media > Podkasty i transmisje na żywo: Transmisje na żywo; Podkasty; Programy radiowe
zh-CN: 媒体 > 播客/直播: 直播; 有声节目; 广播节目
hr-HR: Mediji > Podcasti i prijenosi uživo: Prijenosi uživo; Podcasti; Radioemisije
fr: Médias > Podcasts et diffusions en direct: Diffusions en direct; Podcasts; Émissions de radio
th: สื่อ > พอดแคสต์และสตรีมสด: สตรีมสด; พอดแคสต์; รายการวิทยุ
sk-SK: Médiá > Podcasty a živé prenosy: Priame prenosy; Podcasty; Rozhlasové relácie
zh-TW: 媒體 > Podcast/直播: 直播; Podcast 節目; 廣播節目
nb: Medier > Podkaster og direktesendinger: Direktesendinger; Podkaster; Radioprogrammer
en: Media > Podcasts & Live Streams: Live Streams; Podcasts; Radio Shows
sl-SI: Mediji > Poddaje in prenosi v živo: Prenosi v živo; Poddaje; Radijske oddaje
tr: Medya > Podcast'ler ve Canlı Yayınlar: Canlı yayınlar; Podcast'ler; Radyo Programları
pt-PT: Multimédia > Podcasts e transmissões ao vivo: Transmissões ao vivo; Podcasts; Programas de rádio
ro-RO: Media > Podcasturi și transmisiuni live: Transmisiuni live; Podcasturi; Emisiuni radio
nl: Media > Podcasts en livestreams: Livestreams; Podcasts; Radioshows
ja: メディア > ポッドキャスト・ライブストリーム: ライブストリーム; 各種ポッドキャスト; ラジオ番組
vi: Truyền thông > Podcast & chương trình phát trực tiếp: Chương trình phát trực tiếp; Podcast; Chương trình phát thanh
ru: Медиаконтент > Подкасты и прямые трансляции: Прямые трансляции; Подкасты; Радиопрограммы
sv: Media > Podcaster och liveströmmar: Liveströmmar; Podcaster; Radioprogram
pt-BR: Mídia > Podcasts e transmissões ao vivo: Transmissões ao vivo; Podcasts; Programas de rádio
de: Medien > Podcasts und Live-Streams: Live-Streams; Podcasts; Radiosendungen
es: Multimedia > Podcasts y transmisiones en directo: Transmisiones en directo; Podcasts; Programas de radio
da: Medier > Podcasts og livestreams: Livestreams; Podcasts; Radioprogrammer
it: Media > Podcast e live streaming: Live streaming; Podcast; Spettacoli radiofonici
ko: 미디어 > 팟캐스트/라이브 스트리밍: 라이브 스트리밍; 팟캐스트; 라디오 프로그램
el: Μέσα ενημέρωσης > Podcasts και ζωντανές ροές: Ζωντανές ροές; Podcasts; Ραδιοφωνικές εκπομπές
lt-LT: Medija > Tinklalaidės ir tiesioginės transliacijos: Tiesioginės transliacijos; Tinklalaidės; Radijo laidos
bg-BG: Медия > Подкасти и потоци на живо: Потоци на живо; Подкасти; Радиопредавания
hu: Média > Podcastok és élő közvetítések: Élő közvetítések; Podcastok; Rádióműsorok